Georgia, session 2025_26, HB779.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 7 of Title 44 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
landlord and tenant in general, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"44-7-14.2.
(a) The landlord or manager of any apartment building or complex shall provide local
police and fire departments with current and up to date:
(1) After hours maintenance telephone numbers; and
(2) After hours management telephone numbers.
(b) Any landlord or manager found to be in violation of subsection (a) of this Code section
shall be fined $2,000.00 per violation.
H. B. 779
- 1 -

LC 62 0098
(c) Any landlord or manager found to be in continuing violation of subsection (a) of this
Code section shall be fined every five days they remain in violation.
(d) Any landlord or manager who receives a communication from local police and fire
departments shall respond to such communication within one hour. If the landlord or
manager does not respond, they shall be fined $5,000.00.
(e) All fines collected pursuant to this Code section shall be paid into Clayton County
Public Schools Homeless Education Department."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025, and shall apply to all violations occurring
on or after such date.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 779
- 2 -